Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.180

Transfer of system upon annexation or incorporation of area.

In the event of the annexation to a city or town of an area, or incorporation of an area, in which a county is operating a sewerage and/or water system, the property, facilities, and equipment of such sewerage and/or water system lying within the annexed or incorporated area may be transferred to the city or town if such transfer will not materially affect the operation of any of the remaining county system, subject to the assumption by the city or town of the county's obligations relating to such property, facilities, and equipment, under the procedures specified in, and pursuant to the authority contained in, chapter 35.13A RCW.

[ 1986 c 234 s 34; 1983 c 3 s 82; 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 8; 1967 c 72 s 18.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: See notes following RCW 36.94.010.